Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
Article 3 Personnel
31-11-60.
Obtaining and administering drugs by certified employees of counties or municipalities.

Any emergency medical technician, paramedic, or cardiac technician who is certified under this article and who works for a county or municipal police department, fire department, or rescue unit is authorized to obtain any substance which such person is authorized to administer by virtue of his certification. Any such unit to which the emergency medical technician, paramedic, or cardiac technician is attached must be licensed by the department as a medical first responder unit. Such unit may then obtain from a hospital pharmacy those legend drugs listed and legally permitted to be used by paramedics, emergency medical technicians, or cardiac technicians. The first responder unit shall have a signed agreement with the hospital in order for the hospital to furnish such drugs, and a copy of this agreement must be filed with the Georgia Drugs and Narcotics Agency. The requirements for administering, controlling, and storing these drugs shall be the same as the requirements for a standard ward inventory in a hospital.

Any substance obtained under subsection (a) of this Code section shall be used only in connection with the emergency medical technician’s, paramedic’s, or cardiac technician’s employment with the county or municipality, as such, and only while on duty as an emergency medical technician, paramedic, or cardiac technician.

It shall not be necessary for an emergency medical technician, paramedic, or cardiac technician to be assigned to a licensed ambulance service in order to obtain any substance under subsection (a) of this Code section.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-3112.13, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1758, § 1; Ga. L. 1988, p. 1923, § 8.

31-11-60.1.
Program for physician control over emergency medical services to nonhospital patients.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Ambulance service medical director” means a physician licensed to practice in this state and subject to the approval of the local coordinating entity and the department who has agreed, in writing, to provide medical direction to a specific ambulance service.

“Base station facility” means any facility responsible for providing direct physician control of emergency medical services.

“District emergency medical services medical director” means a person who is:

A physician licensed to practice medicine in this state;

Familiar with the design and operation of prehospital emergency services systems;

Experienced in the prehospital emergency care of acutely ill or injured patients; and

Experienced in the administrative processes affecting regional and state prehospital emergency medical services systems.

“Emergency medical services personnel” means any emergency medical technician, paramedic, cardiac technician, or designated first responder who is certified under this article.

The department and the district emergency medical services medical directors shall develop and implement a program to ensure appropriate physician control over the rendering of emergency medical services by emergency medical services personnel to patients who are not in a hospital, which program shall include but not be limited to the following:

Medical protocols regarding permissible and appropriate emergency medical services which may be rendered by emergency medical services personnel to a patient not in a hospital;

Communication protocols regarding which medical situations require direct voice communication between emergency medical services personnel and a physician or a nurse or a paramedic or a physician assistant in direct communication with a physician prior to those emergency medical services personnel’s rendering specified emergency medical services to a patient not in a hospital;

Record-keeping and accountability requirements for emergency medical services personnel and base station facility personnel in order to monitor compliance with this subsection; and

Base station facility standards.

The ambulance service medical director shall serve as the medical authority for the ambulance service, performing liaison activities with the medical community, medical facilities, and governmental agencies. The ambulance service medical director shall be responsible for the provision of medical direction and training for the emergency medical services personnel within the ambulance service for which he is responsible in conformance with acceptable emergency medical practices and procedures. These responsibilities shall include the duties set forth in the department’s rules and regulations for ambulance services.

The district emergency medical services medical director shall not override those policies or protocols of the ambulance service medical director if that ambulance service medical director is documenting compliance with the department’s rules and regulations for ambulance services.

Every base station facility shall comply with the policies, protocols, requirements, and standards provided for in subsection (b) of this Code section.

All emergency medical services personnel shall comply with appropriate policies, protocols, requirements, and standards of the ambulance service medical director for that service or the policies, protocols, requirements, and standards provided for in subsection (b) of this Code section.

Conduct which would otherwise constitute a violation of subsection (f) of this Code section shall not be such a violation if such conduct was carried out by any emergency medical services personnel pursuant to an order from a physician, the ambulance service medical director for such person, or the protocol of that ambulance service as approved by the ambulance service medical director for such person.

Violation by any base station facility of subsection (e) of this Code section may be grounds for the removal of that base station facility’s designation by the department.

Enforcement of subsections (g) and (h) of this Code section shall commence no earlier than 12 months after July 1, 1989.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-11-60.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1782, § 3; Ga. L. 2009, p. 859, § 3/HB 509.

31-11-60.2.
Testing for illegal drug usage by emergency medical technicians; requirements.

All persons licensed or certified based upon successful completion of training set forth in paragraph (1) of subsection (e) of Code Section 31-11-51 or paragraph (1) of subsection (c) of Code Section 31-11-52 shall be subject to random testing for evidence of use of illegal drugs. Such testing shall occur at least biannually for the first two years of licensure or certification. Such testing shall be noninvasive and may be conducted at any time during the calendar year, and the cost of all such testing shall be borne by the employer. If the drug test shows the presence of drugs in the employee’s system, the results of the test will be confirmed with an alternative method by using the same urine sample.

The department shall adopt rules and regulations to establish for purposes of testing and retesting for illegal drugs:

Which illegal drugs will be the subject of testing;

Methods for ensuring minimal privacy intrusions during collection of body fluid specimens for such testing;

Methods for ensuring proper storage, transportation, and handling of such specimens in order to maintain the integrity of the testing process;

Which persons should be entitled to the results of such tests and which methods should be used for ensuring that only authorized persons are given access to such results;

A list of laboratories qualified to conduct established drug tests; and

Procedures through which emergency medical services personnel, paramedics, or cardiac technicians, prior to the collection of body fluid specimens for such testing, may provide information to their employers regarding use of any drug pursuant to a medical prescription or, as otherwise authorized by law, any substance which could affect the results of such test.

Any rules or regulations adopted pursuant to this Code section shall be in compliance with Parts 40 and 382 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-11-60.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 2021, p. 782, § 7/SB 46.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective May 10, 2021.

31-11-61.
Penalty.

Any person who shall falsely represent himself to be a certified emergency medical technician, certified cardiac technician, or certified paramedic or who shall accept or continue in employment as such and perform the duties thereof without being certified as prescribed by this chapter shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-3112.10, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 281, § 11; Ga. L. 1988, p. 1923, § 9.